Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 2

Alternative Provisions for Creation and Governance of Regional Transportation Authorities

64-8-201. Purposes of regional transportation authority.

The express purposes of the regional transportation authority are to improve mobility and expand multimodal transportation options for residents and visitors in Tennessee's large urban areas. The intent of the legislation is to respond to the growing need for regional approaches and solutions to managing traffic congestion and improving transportation options for residents, businesses and visitors in Tennessee's large urban areas. In an effort to ensure continued economic growth and prosperity and to encourage environmental sustainability, this part seeks to establish additional tools for local governments in those areas to work cooperatively to plan, finance, construct, operate, maintain and manage mass transit systems and related activities to include, but not be limited to, demand-response transit services, vanpool programs, rideshare programs, local bus services, regional bus services, bus rapid transit services, light rail transit services, commuter rail services, park-and-ride lots, transit oriented development nodes and all infrastructure that would be required to support or sustain these facilities or services and developments.

Acts 2009, ch. 362, § 1.

64-8-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” means a regional transportation authority created pursuant to this part or reconstituted pursuant to § 64-8-203(b);

“Board” means the board of directors of an authority;

“Creating municipality” means any metropolitan form of government, city, town or county that creates an authority pursuant to this part;

“Executive officer” means the mayor, county mayor or other chief executive officer of any creating municipality;

“Governing body” means the chief legislative body of any creating municipality;

“Mass transit system” means, without limitation, a combination of real and personal property, structures, improvements, buildings, terminals, parking facilities, equipment, plans, and rights-of-way, public rail and fixed guideway transportation facilities, rail or fixed guideway access to, from or between other transportation terminals, and commuter railroads and commuter rail facilities, or any combination thereof or addition thereto, used, directly or indirectly, useful or convenient for the purpose of public transportation by automobile, truck, bus, rapid transit vehicle, light rail or heavy rail;

“Metropolitan government” means the political entity created by consolidation of all, or substantially all, of the political and corporate functions of a county and a city or town or cities or towns;

“Metropolitan planning organization” means the federally designated regional transportation planning agency established for urbanized areas of at least fifty thousand (50,000) people to develop a long-range regional transportation plan and short-range transportation improvement program;

“Regional transportation authority of Middle Tennessee” means the regional transportation authority created by part 1 of this chapter and composed of certain counties and the cities and towns contained in those counties, those counties being Davidson, Sumner, Williamson, Wilson, Robertson, Cheatham, Maury, Dickson and Rutherford;

“State” means the state of Tennessee;

“Transit adjacent development” means development near or next to a transit station that promotes or takes advantage of transit ridership but is not designed specifically around a transit station; and

“Transit oriented development” or “TOD” means, without limitation, land use development centrally located around a transit station, sometimes part of the station or where the station is a prominent feature of the development, that has a mixture of land uses in close proximity to one another, including office, residential, retail, public and civic uses, occurring at a relatively high density. TOD is designed to be walkable and easy to navigate by bicycles and other nonmotorized modes of transportation.

Acts 2009, ch. 362, § 1; 2012, ch. 835, § 1.

64-8-203. Creation of a regional transportation authority.

Except as provided in subsection (b), any metropolitan government of a population of not less than two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the most recent federal census, or any combination of local governments, including metropolitan governments, adjacent counties or municipalities in adjacent counties, having a combined population of not less than two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the most recent federal census, may create a regional transportation authority in the manner provided in this part.

The governing bodies of all creating municipalities for a proposed new regional transportation authority, upon a determination that there is a public purpose, a public and governmental function for the services a regional transportation authority may provide and that the public convenience and necessity requires the creation of a regional transportation authority, may adopt a joint resolution so declaring and creating an authority, which resolution shall designate the name and principal office address of the authority. A certified copy of the joint resolution bearing the signatures of each of the creating municipalities shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the commissioner of transportation; and upon adoption and filing, the authority shall constitute a body politic and corporate, with all the powers provided in this part.

Using the process described for creation in subdivision (a)(2), additional metropolitan governments, counties or municipalities may join an established regional transportation authority so long as such entity is part of a county that is adjacent to the existing boundaries of a regional transportation authority and accepted into the authority with at least a simple majority vote of acceptance by the board of the authority.

The regional transportation authority of Middle Tennessee shall continue to operate as a regional transportation authority under part 1 of this chapter, but may, by a simple majority vote of its governing board, assume and have the authority to exercise the powers, duties and functions of a regional transportation authority under this part in addition to powers authorized in part 1 of this chapter; provided, that the continued participation of each local government in the regional transportation authority of Middle Tennessee shall be ratified by a vote of its local legislative body. The vote shall take place within the timeframe established by the board of the authority, but not less than sixty (60) days from the date on which the vote is taken to assume the powers, duties and functions of a regional transportation authority under this part.

Acts 2009, ch. 362, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

64-8-204. Governing board — Executive committee — Adoption of ethical standards.

An authority shall be governed by a board consisting of the following representation:

The county mayor, county executive or metropolitan mayor or executive of each county included within the authority;

The mayor of each incorporated town or city included in the authority;

The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee; and

One (1) person residing in each county of the authority to be appointed by the governor. In making such appointments, the governor shall appoint persons who are knowledgeable concerning mass transit and who reflect the composition and interest of the population of the county from which they are appointed.

The ex officio members of the board shall serve during their terms of office, and the appointed members of the board shall be appointed to five-year terms and may be reappointed.

The board shall elect a chair from its membership and such other officers as it may deem necessary.

The board shall meet at least annually, and special meetings may be called at any time by the chair or upon request of a majority of the membership, following the service of reasonable notice on all board members.

The commissioner of transportation or any ex officio member may have a designated alternate who shall be entitled to vote and fully participate in the actions of the board in the stead of the ex officio member. The authority in the bylaws shall establish the process, scope, tenure and procedure of designation of an alternate.

Actions of the board shall require a majority vote of a quorum of the board, such quorum being set by the authority's bylaws.

The board may establish through bylaws an executive committee and procedures and rules for its operation as it may deem necessary. The executive committee may be empowered to perform as the administrative body of the board. The executive committee may be empowered by the board to act in its stead.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but appointed members may receive reimbursement for necessary travel expenses from funds available to the authority.

The board may adopt ethical standards for all board members, officials and employees of the authority. If an ethical standard established by the board is more stringent than an ethical standard established by or pursuant to a law of general application, public law of local application, local option law or private act applicable to an individual board member, official or employee of the authority, then the more stringent standard adopted by the board shall control. Any violation of ethical standards pursuant to this subsection (h) may be enforced by the board in accordance with existing law in the same manner as is applicable to officials or employees of entities pursuant to title 8, chapter 17.

Acts 2009, ch. 362, § 1.

64-8-205. Employment of personnel or contracting for services.

The board may employ such personnel or contract for professional planning, engineering, management, operating, and support services as it may deem necessary from funds available to it. The board may also utilize services or assistance including the loan of personnel from any member county or municipality, public transit agency, metropolitan planning organization, rural planning organization, regional council of governments, development district or state agency or department.

Acts 2009, ch. 362, § 1.

64-8-206. Development of plan — Additional powers and duties.

The board shall develop a plan for the operation and expansion of mass transit services in the authority's region. The plan shall be consistent with the multi-modal regional transportation plan adopted by the region's metropolitan planning organization or similar regional transportation planning body and be reflective of the transportation goals and objectives of the municipalities and counties located within the authority's area. An authority shall work cooperatively with any state or federally mandated metropolitan planning organization having planning and programming powers in the authority's area to produce a regional transit plan. It is not the intent of this section to establish or designate an authority as the metropolitan planning organization for any particular region. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

A map and description of existing and proposed transit corridors;

A map and description of areas to be served;

A description of the frequency and method of providing existing and proposed transit services in those areas;

A description of how regional services will be coordinated with local public and private transportation operators and agencies;

A description of how existing and proposed regional services will be funded, including a plan to coordinate contributions from public and private sources throughout the region;

A description of how the regional transportation authority plans to deliver service, either directly or through contract, agreement or some other method, with other public or private transportation agencies or other entities;

A provision for the conduct of special services for disabled persons or other persons unable to use regularly scheduled and equipped services sufficient to meet the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.);

A provision of services for special events or occasions;

A description for how the regional transportation authority intends to use its property around existing and proposed transit stations to encourage ridership and to support local community goals for quality growth. The description shall include an overview of any intent of the authority to pursue transit oriented development or transit adjacent development plans, or both, in cooperation with local governments and within local zoning regulations and land use policies. It is the legislative intent to allow the authority to negotiate with private developers or other public agencies for the best use of land owned or leased by the authority, including long-term land leases or subleases, or the development of office, retail, or residential establishments, or any of these, on transit district property to generate transit ridership and to support local and regional economic growth; and

Any other provisions necessary or desirable to establish a coordinated, reliable, scheduled regional service.

In addition to the powers to plan for mass transit services, the authority shall have the following additional powers and duties in order to implement its plans for mass transit and other transportation services and plans for transit adjacent and transit oriented development:

To organize itself into a public body, elect officers and adopt bylaws for the purpose of carrying out the functions authorized by this part;

To sue and be sued in its name with any causes of action against the authority or recovery against the authority governed by and subject to the limitations imposed by the Governmental Tort Liability Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 20. No claim may be brought or judgment entered against any metropolitan government, municipality or county that creates or joins an authority for the acts or omissions of the authority;

To enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with governmental, not-for-profit and for-profit entities;

To purchase, own, lease and dispose of real and personal property, and construct buildings and other structures, in furtherance of the purposes of and the implementation of the authority's transit and transportation plans and plans for transit adjacent and transit oriented development. The authority shall comply with all local land use and land development laws and regulations, including zoning ordinances and resolutions, subdivision regulations and building codes, in the implementation of the authority's plans. Local governments may waive all or part of applicable local laws and regulations to assist the authority in plan implementation;

To employ personnel or contract with public or private entities to construct or operate transportation and transit services and to participate in the development of transit adjacent and transit oriented developments. An authority shall not operate local transit services in an area already receiving those services without the consent of the local governing body of that area;

To employ or contract for professional services, such as, but not limited to, management, planning, support, engineering, legal, accounting and auditing services;

To utilize for transit or transportation services any property, right-of-way, easement or other similar property owned or held by the state or any municipality, county or metropolitan government or federal government department or agency within the transportation service area of the authority that may be necessary and convenient for the implementation of the authority's transit and transportation plans so long as the governmental entity owning or controlling such property shall consent to the authority's use;

To establish local assessments for the purposes of paying expenses related to the administration of the authority's activities, including, but not limited to, the costs associated with insurance policies and deductibles, to be paid by its city, town, metropolitan government and county government members. Local assessments shall not be used for the construction or operation of transportation facilities or services. The local assessment shall be based on a per capita and a flat rate. In establishing the per capita assessment, the authority shall use the population figures of the latest census as described for the use of development districts in § 13-14-111(d). For any regional transportation authority created under this part, the per capita assessment shall be established by a majority vote of the governing board, but shall not be less than ten cents (10¢) per capita. For the purpose of calculating the assessment for any county or metropolitan government, the population of any town or city located wholly or partly within the county, or the towns or cities within the geographic boundary of the metropolitan government, but that are not a part of the metropolitan government, shall not be included in the population of the county or metropolitan government. The authority's local assessment shall be imposed on October 1 of each calendar year, and the member government shall pay either the per capita rate or the flat assessment, whichever is greater. Failure of a city, town, metropolitan or county government to pay the assessment shall result in the loss of that government's participation in the governance and benefits of the authority;

To impose fees for the services provided by the authority;

To accept grant funds from the state or federal government, subject to the approval, restrictions and requirements of the state or federal government grantor and to accept contributions or donations from other public or private entities. Metropolitan governments, counties, cities and towns may provide, and the authority may accept, funds from any source allowable by law and not prohibited by the Tennessee constitution. The authority shall not claim any federal or state grants used to provide local transit services awarded to a local transit operator or local government without the consent of the local government or governments. Such restriction shall not prohibit a metropolitan planning organization, the governor or other grantor from allocating or programming funds to transportation projects as required by federal law; and

To borrow money in order to proceed with or finish the construction of mass transit or other transportation services or to fund the operations and capital cost of such services and purchase of real property and the construction of infrastructure and improvements or contract for the construction of the infrastructure and improvements to implement the authority's plans. The authority may enter into a security agreement pledging, as appropriate, to secure the loan with:

Anticipated forthcoming grants from the state or federal government, subject to the approval, restrictions and requirements of the state or federal government grantor; provided, however, that such approval must be reauthorized if the funds are not received within one (1) year of the initial approval;

Anticipated assessments from local governments pursuant to subdivision (b)(8);

The authority's real or personal property; or

Other revenues.

The implementation of the authority's transit and transportation plans and plans for transit adjacent and transit oriented development will necessitate the acquisition, construction, operation and maintenance of properties, facilities and equipment and the employment of personnel or contracting for services, all of which the authority is authorized to undertake and accomplish and all of which are declared and deemed to be for public and governmental functions conducted by the authority. The authority is a public body corporate and politic and all powers and duties granted by this part are and shall be declared public and corporate purposes and matters of public necessity.

Acts 2009, ch. 362, § 1.